District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Revised Business Licensing Reform Emergency Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 13(q) of the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Act of 1975, effective
March 26, 1976 (D.C. Law 1-58; D.C. Official Code § 1-309.10(q)), is amended to read as
follows:
“(q)(1) Before granting or renewing a license for a theater, cinema, skating rink, dance
hall, exhibition, lecture, or other entertainment, the Department of Licensing and Consumer
Protection shall give 30-days notice by first-class mail or electronic mail to the affected
Commission. The notice shall contain the name of the applicant and a description, by street
number, or other plain designation, of the particular location for which the license is requested.
“(2) Pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, the Department of Licensing and
Consumer Protection shall give great weight to the Commission’s recommendations when
determining whether to grant or renew the licenses.”.
Sec. 3. Subchapter I-A of Chapter 28 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official
Code is amended as follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
follows:
“47-2851.25. Refund of erroneously paid fees.”.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(b) Section 47-2851.04 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “; and” in its place.
(B) A new paragraph (3) is added to read as follows:
“(3) $198 for a 4-year license.”.
(2) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting
a semicolon in its place.
(B) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
phrase “; and” in its place.
(C) A new paragraph (3) is added to read as follows:
“(3) A 4-year license, a person shall pay a license fee of $198.”.
(c) Section 47-2851.07(c) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) Licenses issued under this subchapter shall be valid for a period of 6 months, 2 years,
or 4 years.”.
(d) Section 47-2851.10(b)(3)(B) is amended by striking the phrase “months, but less than
9 months, may” and inserting the phrase “month may” in its place.
(e) A new section 47-2851.25 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-2851.25. Refund of erroneously paid fees.
“The Mayor may refund any license fee or tax, or portion thereof, erroneously paid or
collected under this chapter.”.
Sec. 4. Applicability
This act shall apply as of October 1, 2025.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3